Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3910
Special jurisdiction.

(1) A court
of this state lacking jurisdiction under section 30-3909 has special jurisdiction
to do any of the following:

(a) Appoint
a guardian in an emergency for a term not exceeding ninety days for a respondent
who is physically present in this state;

(b) Issue a protective order with respect
to real or tangible personal property located in this state; or

(c) Appoint
a guardian or conservator for an incapacitated or protected person for whom
a provisional order to transfer the proceeding from another state has been
issued under procedures similar to section 30-3916.

(2) If a petition for
the appointment of a guardian in an emergency is brought in this state and
this state was not the respondent's home state on the date the petition was
filed, the court shall dismiss the proceeding at the request of the court
of the home state, if any, whether dismissal is requested before or after
the emergency appointment.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 14.